Montana, session 2025, HB935.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Fox Hills-Hell Creek aquifer -- temporary suspension of action on permits --
groundwater GROUND WATER study. (1) In order to balance the need for continued development of Montana's
water and for protection of existing water rights in the Fox Hills -Hell Creek aquifer, the department may
suspend action on a class of applications or may close an aquifer source and refuse to accept a class of
applications, or both, for a permit to appropriate ground water from that source pursuant to this part.
(2) Pursuant to subsection (1), the department may suspend or close permit applications to
appropriate ground water from the Fox Hills-Hell Creek aquifer within department administrative boundaries
39E, 39FJ, 39G, 39H, 40D, 40E, 40P, 40Q, 40R, 40S, 42A, 42C, 42J, 42K, 42KJ, 42L, and 42M if the proposed
appropriation is 3, 000 gallons a minute or more.
(3) The bureau of mines and geology shall complete a feasibility study on ground water availability
from the Fox Hills-Hell Creek aquifer in the department administrative boundaries listed in subsection (2) 39E,
39FJ, 39G, 39H, 40D, 40E, 40P, 40Q, 40R, 40S, 42A, 42C, 42J, 42K, 42KJ, 42L, and 42M. The study may
include:
(a) the compilation and update of new geologic and hydrogeologic data;
(b) a limited field collection of water levels and pressure for wells with historical data;
(c) a preliminary water budget for the Fox Hills-Hell Creek aquifer; and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 935
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 935
(d) a preliminary model to evaluate the effects of pumping on water levels and pressure.
(2) The bureau shall report the progress and results of its study to the water policy interim
committee established in 5-5-231. The committee shall consider the results of the study and make
recommendations to the legislature for department suspension or closure of new ground water appropriations
from the Fox Hills-Hell Creek aquifer.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
85, chapter 2, part 3, and the provisions of Title 85, chapter 2, part 3, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 4. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 935
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 935, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 935
INTRODUCED BY M. THIEL, B. CARTER, S. MANESS, R. MINER, G. OBLANDER, G. PARRY, J.
SCHILLINGER
AN ACT PROVIDING FOR A STUDY OF DEPARTMENT SUSPENSION OR CLOSURE OF NEW GROUND
WATER APPROPRIATIONS IN THE FOX HILLS-HELL CREEK AQUIFER; PROVIDING FOR A FEASIBILITY
STUDY OF GROUND WATER AVAILABILITY; PROVIDING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS;
APPROPRIATING FUNDS; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION
DATE.”